Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1035
Attached property out of sheriff's possession; repossession; power of court to order.

The court may order the sheriff to repossess himself, for the purpose of selling it, of any of the attached property which may have passed out of his hands without having been sold or converted into money; and the sheriff shall, under such order, have the same power to take the property as he would have under an order of attachment.

R.S.1867, Code § 230, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 7764;

C.S.1922, § 8708;

C.S.1929, § 20-1035;

R.S.1943, § 25-1035.